Illinois, session 104th, HB1243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 513B-20.40 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/13B-20.40 new)7    Sec. 13B-20.40. Pilot program.8    (a) The General Assembly recognizes that helping students 9to build social, emotional, and academic success from an early 10age is essential to long-term success in schools and, as a 11result of the COVID-19 pandemic and other factors, more 12students are exhibiting behavioral concerns that make it 13difficult to thrive in traditional educational settings. 14Furthermore, alternative learning opportunities programs are 15designed to provide varied support to improve the educational 16achievement of students at risk of academic failure, and 17Summit Academy, the alternative learning opportunities program 18operated by Regional Office of Education No. 4, has a stated 19mission anchored in positive outcomes, with the goal of 20restoring and returning every student to that student's home 21school. 22    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, Regional 23Office of Education No. 4 shall establish a 3-year pilot   HB1243- 2 -LRB104 06190 LNS 16225 b1alternative learning opportunities program focused on serving 2students in grades kindergarten through 3.3    (c) Students in grades kindergarten through 3 who meet 4enrollment criteria established by a school district and who 5are at risk of academic failure are eligible to participate in 6the pilot program.7    (d) The pilot program shall adhere to all other rules 8established for alternative learning opportunities programs.9    (e) No later than March 31, 2028, Regional Office of 10Education No. 4 shall provide a report to the General Assembly 11outlining the pilot program's methodology and student outcomes 12and setting forth a comprehensive impact report and a 13framework for future program models. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.